tests/verbs-imp.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[lexd] бар imp":
    бар<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : барыым
    бар<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : бар
    бар<v><iv><imp><p3><sg> : бардын
    бар<v><iv><imp><p1><du> : барыах
    бар<v><iv><imp><p1><pl> : { барыаҕыҥ , барыаххайыҥ }
    бар<v><iv><imp><p2><pl> : барыҥ
    бар<v><iv><imp><p3><pl> : бардыннар

  "[lexd] булкус imp":
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p1><sg> : булкуһуум
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p2><sg> : булкус
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p3><sg> : булкустун
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p1><du> : булкуһуох
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p1><pl> : { булкуһуоҕуҥ , булкуһуоххайыҥ }
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p2><pl> : булкуһуҥ
    булкус<v><iv><imp><p3><pl> : булкустунар

  "[lexd] сиэ imp":
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : сиим
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : сиэ
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : сиэтин
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p1><du> : сиэх
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : { сиэҕиҥ , сиэххэйиҥ }
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : сиэҥ
    сиэ<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : сиэтинэр

  "[lexd] бараа imp":
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : барыым
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : бараа
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : бараатын
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p1><du> : барыах
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : { барыаҕыҥ , барыаххайыҥ }
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : барааҥ
    бараа<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : бараатынар

  "[lexd] көм imp":
    көм<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : көмүүм
    көм<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : көм
    көм<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : көмтүн
    көм<v><tv><imp><p1><du> : көмүөх
    көм<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : { көмүөҕуҥ , көмүөххэйиҥ }
    көм<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : көмүҥ
    көм<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : көмтүнэр

  "[lexd] бар neg.imp":
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : барымыым
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : барыма
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p3><sg> : барбатын
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p1><du> : барымыах
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p1><pl> : { барымыаҕыҥ, барымыаххайыҥ }
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><pl> : барымаҥ
    бар<v><iv><neg><imp><p3><pl> : барбатыннар

  "[lexd] булкус neg.imp":
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : булкуһуум
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : булкуһума
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p3><sg> : булкуспатын
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p1><du> : булкуһумуох
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p1><pl> : { булкуһумуоҕуҥ, булкуһумуоххайыҥ }
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><pl> : булкуһумаҥ
    булкус<v><iv><neg><imp><p3><pl> : булкуһуспатынар

  "[lexd] сиэ neg.imp":
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : сиэмиим
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : сиэмэ
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p3><sg> : сиэбэтин
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><du> : сиэмиэх
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><pl> : { сиэмимиэҕиҥ , сиэмимиэххэйиҥ }
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><pl> : сиэмэҥ
    сиэ<v><tv><neg><imp><p3><pl> : сиэбэтинэр

  "[lexd] бараа neg.imp":
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : бараамыым
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : бараама
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p3><sg> : бараабатын
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><du> : бараамыах
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><pl> : { бараамыыаҕыҥ , бараамыаххайыҥ }
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><pl> : бараамаҥ
    бараа<v><tv><neg><imp><p3><pl> : бараабатынар

  "[lexd] көм neg.imp":
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><sg> : көмүүмүүм
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : көмүүмэ
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p3><sg> : көмпөтүн
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><du> : көмүмүөх
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p1><pl> : { көмүмүөҕуҥ , көмүмүөххэйиҥ }
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p2><pl> : көмүмэҥ
    көм<v><tv><neg><imp><p3><pl> : көмпөтүнэр
